Wyoming, session 2026, HB0011.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-26-517 is created to read:

1-26-517. Landowner's bill of rights.

HB0011

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0199
(a) The following landowner's bill of rights applies
to any attempt by a public entity or other person to
condemn a landowner's property under this act.

(b) A person with eminent domain authority shall
provide a written notice of the following, which shall be
known as the landowner's bill of rights brochure, to a
landowner before or at the same time as the person first
represents to the landowner that the person will or may
attempt to condemn the landowner's property through eminent
domain proceedings:

(i) That the landowner is entitled to receive
adequate compensation pursuant to W.S. 1-26-702 through
1-26-715 if the landowner's property is taken through
eminent domain;

(ii) That the landowner's property may be taken
only as provided by the Wyoming constitution or by law.
Under these standards, property can be taken only if the
public interest and necessity require it, the project is
planned or located in the manner that will be most
compatible with the greatest public good and the least
HB0011

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0199
private injury and the property sought to be acquired is
necessary for the project;

(iii) That the landowner's property can only be
condemned by a public entity or person authorized by law to
do so;

(iv) That persons who want to acquire a
landowner's property through an eminent domain process must
notify the landowner that they intend, or in some
circumstances that there is a reasonable probability that
they will intend, to acquire the landowner's property
through eminent domain;

(v) That persons who want to condemn the
landowner's property and who want to enter the property
first for the purpose of conducting activities like
surveys, tests and taking samples must provide written
notice fifteen (15) days in advance of the entry pursuant
to W.S. 1-26-506;

(vi) That persons proposing to condemn a
landowner's property must provide the landowner with
HB0011

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0199
written evidence of the fair market value of the property
to be condemned in the form of a written appraisal, value
finding form or waiver form from a certified appraiser or
other evidence of fair market value as required by W.S.
1-26-704;

(vii) That persons proposing to condemn the
landowner's property shall enter into good faith
negotiations with the landowner, which include a written
notice of the way to contact the person proposing to
condemn the property and an initial written settlement
offer that meets the requirements of W.S. 1-26-509(c)(iii).
Persons proposing to condemn the property must make a good
faith effort to purchase the property before the person
moves to condemn the property;

(viii) That the landowner may hire an appraiser
to determine the value of the property or to assist the
landowner in any condemnation proceeding;

(ix) That the landowner may hire an attorney to
negotiate with the person proposing to condemn the property
HB0011

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0199
and to represent the landowner in any legal proceedings
involving the condemnation;

(x) That before the property is condemned using
a formal condemnation action, the landowner is entitled to
have the amount of compensation determined by an informal
proceeding governed by the Wyoming rules of civil
procedure; and

(xi) That if the landowner is dissatisfied with
the compensation awarded by the informal or formal
proceeding, then the landowner has a right to a trial by a
judge or jury. If the landowner is dissatisfied with the
decision of the judge or jury, then the landowner may
appeal the decision to a higher court.

Section 2. This act shall apply to any eminent domain
action initiated under the Wyoming Eminent Domain Act on or
after July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0011